Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3166
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Caregiver Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 59.